Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201671-9407
Assisting Caregiver Transitions Act; effect.

The Assisting Caregiver Transitions Act does not:

(1) Create a private right of action against a hospital, a hospital employee, or a person with whom the hospital has a contractual relationship;

(2) Create additional civil or regulatory liability for a hospital, a hospital employee, or a person with whom the hospital has a contractual relationship;

(3) Supersede or replace existing rights or remedies under any other law;

(4) Affect a license issued to a hospital pursuant to the Health Care Facility Licensure Act;

(5) Establish a new requirement to reimburse or otherwise pay for services rendered by a caregiver for aftercare; or

(6) Interfere with an individual acting under a valid power of attorney for health care as defined in section 30-3402 or acting as a conservator as defined in section 30-2209.

Laws 2016, LB698, § 13.

Health Care Facility Licensure Act, see section 71-401.